District of Columbia statutes.
11-702

Composition.

The court shall consist of a chief judge and eight associate judges.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 478, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 11-702.
1973 Ed., § 11-702.